New Jersey, session 221, S4057.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.11A:6-24 is amended to read as follows: 11A:6-24.  State employees in the career, senior executive, and unclassified services in titles or circumstances designated by the Civil Service Commission shall be eligible for overtime compensation and holiday pay.  Overtime compensation and holiday pay shall be either cash compensation at a rate representing 1 1/2 times the employee's hourly rate of base salary or compensatory time off at a rate of 1 1/2 hours for each hour worked beyond the regular workweek, at the discretion of the department head, with the approval of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules for the implementation of hours of work, overtime compensation and holiday pay programs, which shall include but need not be limited to application and eligibility procedures, except that remote work shall not be permitted for State employees in the career, senior executive, and unclassified services. (cf: P.L.2008, c.29, s.56) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.